Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,165
Claims and actions; restrictions.

No person or entity not expressly named as a party to a contract entered into by a housing agency shall have any right of action, by virtue of the status of such person or entity as a third-party beneficiary of such contract, or otherwise based upon such contract. Any claim or action in violation of this section shall be absolutely null and void.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 94.